District of Columbia statutes.
29-201.08

Alternative means of approval of transactions.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a domestic entity, approval of a transaction under this chapter by the unanimous vote or consent of its interest holders shall satisfy this chapter for approval of the transaction.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720